Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.76.340

Service regions for educator preparation programs.

(1) The *board must establish boundaries for service regions for institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 implementing professional educator standards board-approved educator preparation programs. Regions shall be established to encourage and support, not exclude, the reach of public institutions of higher education across the state.

(2) Based on the data in the assessment in RCW ** 28B.76.230 and 28B.76.335, the *board shall determine whether reasonable teacher preparation program access for prospective teachers is available in each region. If access is determined to be inadequate in a region, the institution of higher education responsible for the region shall submit a plan for meeting the access need to the *board.

(3) Partnerships with other teacher preparation program providers and the use of appropriate technology shall be considered. The *board shall review the plan and, as appropriate, assist the institution in developing support and resources for implementing the plan.

[ 2010 c 235 s 508.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) The higher education coordinating board was abolished by 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 301, effective July 1, 2012.

**(2) RCW 28B.76.230 was recodified as RCW 28B.77.080 pursuant to 2012 c 229 s 904.

Finding—2010 c 235: See note following RCW 28A.405.245.